

























Fiserv, Inc. (NASDAQ:FISV) Position Boosted by Gardiner Nancy B - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Fiserv Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Fiserv Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Heska Corporation (HSKA) Earning Very Positive News Coverage, Accern Reports
Stellar Capital Management LLC Sells 225 Shares of Yum! Brands, Inc. (NYSE:YUM)
Inogen, Inc (NASDAQ:INGN) Given Consensus Recommendation of “Buy” by Analysts
Credit Suisse AG Has $13.15 Million Position in EPR Properties (NYSE:EPR)
Fiserv, Inc. (NASDAQ:FISV) Position Boosted by Gardiner Nancy B
Credit Suisse AG Boosts Stake in Liberty Interactive Corporation (NASDAQ:QVCA)
24,908 Shares in Investar Holding Corporation (ISTR) Acquired by Tudor Investment Corp ET AL
VCA Inc. (NASDAQ:WOOF) Receives Average Rating of “Hold” from Brokerages
Critical Comparison: Antero Midstream Partners (AM) and Eagle Rock Energy Partners, L.P. (EROC)
Head-To-Head Review: Open Text Corporation (NASDAQ:OTEX) vs. Imprivata (IMPR)
Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for Medpace Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:MEDP) Issued By KeyCorp
American Water Works (AWK) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub
Continental Resources’ (CLR) Buy Rating Reiterated at Scotiabank
Allegion PLC (ALLE) Lifted to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research
IDEX Corporation (IEX) Price Target Raised to $95.00
Government Properties Income Trust (GOV) Earns Outperform Rating from FBR & Co
Macy’s Inc (M) Cut to “Sell” at Zacks Investment Research
Zacks Investment Research Upgrades BioScrip, Inc. (BIOS) to Buy
AeroVironment, Inc. (AVAV) Upgraded by TheStreet to “B”
AQR Capital Management LLC Decreases Stake in Alibaba Group Holding Limited (NYSE:BABA)


 


Fiserv, Inc. (NASDAQ:FISV) Position Boosted by Gardiner Nancy B

Posted by Renee Johnson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Gardiner Nancy B raised its position in shares of Fiserv, Inc. (NASDAQ:FISV) by 6.5% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 12,537 shares of the business services provider’s stock after buying an additional 762 shares during the period. Fiserv accounts for 3.3% of Gardiner Nancy B’s portfolio, making the stock its 10th largest position. Gardiner Nancy B’s holdings in Fiserv were worth $1,445,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
A number of other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also bought and sold shares of the stock. Gulf International Bank UK Ltd increased its position in Fiserv by 1.1% in the first quarter. Gulf International Bank UK Ltd now owns 68,856 shares of the business services provider’s stock worth $7,939,000 after buying an additional 750 shares during the period. Fulton Bank N.A. increased its position in Fiserv by 72.2% in the first quarter. Fulton Bank N.A. now owns 3,643 shares of the business services provider’s stock worth $421,000 after buying an additional 1,528 shares during the period. Rathbone Brothers plc purchased a new position in shares of Fiserv during the first quarter worth about $202,000. Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. increased its position in shares of Fiserv by 2.1% in the first quarter. Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. now owns 186,058 shares of the business services provider’s stock worth $21,455,000 after buying an additional 3,879 shares during the last quarter. Finally, Bridges Investment Counsel Inc. increased its position in shares of Fiserv by 33.6% in the first quarter. Bridges Investment Counsel Inc. now owns 15,400 shares of the business services provider’s stock worth $1,776,000 after buying an additional 3,875 shares during the last quarter. 87.68% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 




Fiserv, Inc. (NASDAQ FISV) opened at 126.23 on Friday. Fiserv, Inc. has a 12 month low of $92.81 and a 12 month high of $127.10. The stock’s 50 day moving average is $124.02 and its 200 day moving average is $117.30. The firm has a market cap of $26.81 billion, a PE ratio of 31.53 and a beta of 0.80. 


 Get Fiserv Inc. alerts:



Fiserv (NASDAQ:FISV) last issued its earnings results on Wednesday, April 26th. The business services provider reported $1.25 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $1.18 by $0.07. The company had revenue of $1.39 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $1.40 billion. Fiserv had a return on equity of 40.28% and a net margin of 15.95%. The business’s revenue was up 4.7% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period in the prior year, the firm posted $1.06 EPS. On average, equities analysts forecast that Fiserv, Inc. will post $5.12 earnings per share for the current year. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: “Fiserv, Inc. (NASDAQ:FISV) Position Boosted by Gardiner Nancy B” was posted by BNB Daily and is the sole property of of BNB Daily. If you are reading this piece of content on another website, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of United States and international trademark and copyright law. The original version of this piece of content can be read at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/21/gardiner-nancy-b-has-1-45-million-stake-in-fiserv-inc-nasdaqfisv-updated.html. 
A number of research analysts have recently issued reports on FISV shares. Zacks Investment Research downgraded shares of Fiserv from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Tuesday, April 18th. Royal Bank Of Canada reiterated a “hold” rating and issued a $123.00 target price on shares of Fiserv in a research note on Friday, April 28th. Cantor Fitzgerald lifted their target price on shares of Fiserv from $107.00 to $118.00 and gave the stock a “neutral” rating in a research note on Friday, April 28th. Guggenheim upgraded shares of Fiserv from a “neutral” rating to a “buy” rating and lifted their target price for the stock from $131.00 to $136.00 in a research note on Monday. Finally, Vetr cut shares of Fiserv from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating and set a $121.50 price objective for the company. in a research note on Thursday, April 20th. Ten analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and seven have assigned a buy rating to the stock. The company currently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $121.12.
In related news, insider Jeffery W. Yabuki sold 2,000 shares of the stock in a transaction that occurred on Wednesday, April 26th. The stock was sold at an average price of $120.19, for a total transaction of $240,380.00. Following the completion of the sale, the insider now owns 337,151 shares in the company, valued at approximately $40,522,178.69. The sale was disclosed in a filing with the SEC, which is available through the SEC website. Also, insider Jeffery W. Yabuki sold 17,000 shares of the stock in a transaction that occurred on Monday, May 22nd. The shares were sold at an average price of $121.85, for a total value of $2,071,450.00. Following the sale, the insider now owns 323,776 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $39,452,105.60. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. In the last three months, insiders have sold 36,000 shares of company stock worth $4,437,850. 1.90% of the stock is currently owned by insiders. 
Fiserv Company Profile
Fiserv, Inc is a provider of financial services technology. The Company provides account processing systems; electronic payments processing products and services, such as electronic bill payments, transaction processing, account-to-account transfers, and person-to-person payments; Internet and mobile banking systems, and related services, including document and payment card production and distribution, and lending and risk management products and services. 

 
Receive News & Ratings for Fiserv Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Fiserv Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 









































Gardiner Nancy B Buys JM Smucker Co, Analog Devices Inc, IPG Photonics Corp, Sells Target Corp, ... - Nasdaq.com


















































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search










































Gardiner Nancy B Buys JM Smucker Co, Analog Devices Inc, IPG Photonics Corp, Sells Target Corp, ...


May 16, 2017, 12:38:03 PM EDT
By insider, GuruFocus









































Shutterstock photo


Gardiner Nancy BNew Purchases: IPGP , MKTX , UN ,Added Positions:SJM, ADI, DHR, CB, HD, FISV, ATR, NVS, MA, SLB,Reduced Positions:MMM, IWD, IWF, ORCL, DE, PEP, MRK, NVO,Sold Out:TGT, SE, CVX,For the details of Gardiner Nancy B's stock buys and sells, go to http://www.gurufocus.com/StockBuy.php?GuruName=Gardiner+Nancy+BThese are the top 5 holdings of Gardiner Nancy B3M Co ( MMM ) - 10,574 shares, 4.79% of the total portfolio. Shares reduced by 5.08%Canadian National Railway Co ( CNI ) - 26,803 shares, 4.7% of the total portfolio. Shares added by 2.84%Automatic Data Processing Inc ( ADP ) - 19,322 shares, 4.69% of the total portfolio. Shares added by 1.90%Johnson & Johnson ( JNJ ) - 15,275 shares, 4.51% of the total portfolio. Shares reduced by 0.53%Apple Inc ( AAPL ) - 12,994 shares, 4.42% of the total portfolio. Shares added by 3.41%New Purchase: IPG Photonics Corp (IPGP)Gardiner Nancy B initiated holdings in IPG Photonics Corp. The purchase prices were between $95.15 and $121.81, with an estimated average price of $113.15. The stock is now traded at around $142.18. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.53%. The holdings were 1,856 shares as of 2017-03-31.New Purchase: MarketAxess Holdings Inc (MKTX)Gardiner Nancy B initiated holdings in MarketAxess Holdings Inc. The purchase prices were between $150.18 and $197.74, with an estimated average price of $181.27. The stock is now traded at around $184.30. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.53%. The holdings were 1,200 shares as of 2017-03-31.New Purchase: Unilever NV (UN)Gardiner Nancy B initiated holdings in Unilever NV. The purchase prices were between $40.27 and $50.6, with an estimated average price of $44.8. The stock is now traded at around $54.82. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.51%. The holdings were 4,300 shares as of 2017-03-31.Added: JM Smucker Co (SJM)Gardiner Nancy B added to the holdings in JM Smucker Co by 83.57%. The purchase prices were between $128.01 and $141.92, with an estimated average price of $135.92. The stock is now traded at around $124.90. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.96%. The holdings were 6,792 shares as of 2017-03-31.Added: Analog Devices Inc (ADI)Gardiner Nancy B added to the holdings in Analog Devices Inc by 37.02%. The purchase prices were between $71.32 and $83.85, with an estimated average price of $78.53. The stock is now traded at around $80.46. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.54%. The holdings were 10,331 shares as of 2017-03-31.Added: The Home Depot Inc (HD)Gardiner Nancy B added to the holdings in The Home Depot Inc by 44.15%. The purchase prices were between $133.53 and $149.6, with an estimated average price of $141.83. The stock is now traded at around $159.93. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.23%. The holdings were 2,155 shares as of 2017-03-31.Sold Out: Target Corp (TGT)Gardiner Nancy B sold out the holdings in Target Corp. The sale prices were between $53.12 and $73.81, with an estimated average price of $62.23.Sold Out: Spectra Energy Corp (SE)Gardiner Nancy B sold out the holdings in Spectra Energy Corp. The sale prices were between $40.68 and $43.45, with an estimated average price of $41.93.Sold Out: Chevron Corp (CVX)Gardiner Nancy B sold out the holdings in Chevron Corp. The sale prices were between $106.28 and $117.85, with an estimated average price of $112.17.Warning! GuruFocus has detected 4 Warning Signs with SJM. Click here to check it out.SJM 15-Year Financial DataThe intrinsic value of SJMPeter Lynch Chart of SJMPremium MembersThis article first appeared on GuruFocus .



The views and opinions expressed herein are the views and opinions of the author and do not necessarily reflect those of Nasdaq, Inc.











This article appears in:
Investing                           
                            
                                , Stocks





Referenced Symbols:

                                        MMM
                                    
, 

                                        CNI
                                    
, 

                                        ADP
                                    
, 

                                        JNJ
                                    
, 

                                        AAPL
                                    












More from GuruFocus



Subscribe




This Powerful Chart Made Peter Lynch 29% A Year For 13 Years
Are CEOs Buying?
Market Overvalued, How to Invest?














Related Stocks Articles




Subscribe







Cypress Semiconductor Enjoys Broad-Based Growth


						7/28/2017 06:49 PM
					



4 Jaw-Dropping Stats About Retirement


						7/28/2017 06:30 PM
					



Lower Earners Just Lost a Key Retirement-Savings Option


						7/28/2017 06:18 PM
					














Contributor:GuruFocus
Stock Picks, Portfolios



Follow on:

























Most Popular




Highest Rated








Mitel To Acquire ShoreTel - Quick Facts
Sientra Completes Acquisition of Miramar Labs®
Seagate Technology PLC Q4 Profit Rises 174%
LedgerX gets U.S. approval for derivatives on digital currencies
U.S. Fines Frontier, American And Delta For Violating Consumer







Shareholders Approve Major Structural Change to Top Performing...
Yatra Attains Leadership Position in Corporate Travel With the...
Mitel To Acquire ShoreTel - Quick Facts
Miller Heiman Group Selects CallidusCloud Datahug for Pipeline...
Tractor Supply Company Reports Second Quarter Results




View All Highest Rated






















Research Brokers before you trade



		Compare Online Brokers
	


Want to trade FX?



		Visit our Forex Broker Center 
	
















Find a Credit Card



                    Select a credit card product by:
                


 Card Type
 Credit Score
 Card Issuer



                    Select an offer:
                





0% APR Credit CardsAirline Credit CardsBalance Transfer Credit CardsBusiness Credit CardsCash Back Credit CardsCharge CardsCharge Cards for BusinessEMV Smart ChipsGas Cards & Auto RewardsHome Improvement Rewards Credit CardsInstant Approval Credit CardsLow Interest Credit CardsNo Annual Fee Credit CardsNo Foreign Transaction Fee Credit CardsPoints Rewards Credit CardsPrepaid & Debit CardsReward Credit CardsStudent Credit CardsTop 10 Best Credit Card Deals and Offers




Bad CreditCredit Quality AverageCredit Quality ExcellentCredit Quality FairCredit Quality GoodLimited or No Credit HistoryPersonal Loans




American ExpressAmerican Express Airline CardsAmerican Express Business CardsAmerican Express Cash Back Credit CardsAmerican Express Charge CardsBarclaycardCapital OneCapital One Cash BackCapital One Fair CreditCapital One MilesCapital One PointsCapital One Prepaid Credit CardsChaseCiti Credit CardsDiscoverDiscover CashbackDiscover MilesDiscover Student Credit CardsMasterCard Credit CardsU.S. BankUSAAUSAA SavingsVisa Credit Cards







Search





Data Provided by BankRate.com






Stocks

Referenced





MMM








75%



Rate It





CNI








86%



Rate It





ADP








100%



Rate It





JNJ








83%



Rate It





AAPL








86%



Rate It































CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX











































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Gardiner, Nancy B. | Hemenway & Barnes































GO




CareersContact UsClient Login 

AboutPrivate Client ServicesLegal ServicesOur ClientsOur PeopleNews & Resources 


AboutPrivate Client ServicesLegal ServicesOur ClientsOur PeopleNews & Resources CareersContact UsClient Login 












Nancy B. Gardiner
Partner, Director of Family Office and Philanthropy Services

617-557-9767617-227-0781 

75 State StreetBoston, MA 02109 
ngardiner@hembar.com





Nancy B. Gardiner
Partner, Director of Family Office and Philanthropy Services

617-557-9767617-227-0781 

75 State StreetBoston, MA 02109 

  
Printer-Friendly Version 


Practice Focus
Nancy Gardiner works with families on governance, succession and all facets of family office creation, operation and management. She also advises individuals and families on all aspects of charitable giving, including the creation of charitable vehicles, such as private foundations, advising families and individuals regarding areas of interest and the structuring of individual gifts. Nancy also counsels development offices on issues relating to major gifts.
Nancy also oversees the firm's Philanthropy and Family Office Services which includes helping clients accomplish everyday tasks, such as bill paying, relocations, assisted living arrangement, oversight of special assets or collections and other issues related to "life management." Nancy is also Managing Director and Secretary of Hemenway Trust Company, a New Hampshire based private fiduciary firm.
Representative Experience
Nancy's clients include families and individuals throughout New England.

Co-Trustee of Jane's Trust, a leading charitable trust in New England, and other charitable trusts and foundations
Works with families on the transition of wealth from one generation to the next, with a focus on legal, financial, and philanthropic objectives
Advises development offices of major nonprofit organizations throughout New England and has experience in board issues and the structuring of gifts and creating agreements to protect the interests of both the donor and the recipient institution
Represents nonprofit organizations, primarily in the areas of governance and development
Advises families on the dynamics of passing a family business from one generation to another and on the strategic issues involved in the evolution of a family business

Accolades

Named to Best Lawyers in America
Awarded Lawyer of the Year in Non-Profit / Charities Law in the Boston metro area

Activities and Publications
A former lecturer at Boston College's Carroll School of Management, Nancy Gardiner has written on topics related to nonprofit management and philanthropy. She speaks on all facets of philanthropy, including how it is an integral part of a family’s legacy, to groups including the Family Office Exchange, Planned Giving Group of New England (PGGNE), and the Association of Fundraising Professionals.
Nancy has written a chapter on board structure and function in the Massachusetts Continuing Legal Education (MCLE) book Massachusetts Nonprofit Organizations.
Community Involvement


Chair of the Board of Associated Grant Makers, Inc.
Board of Governors, Colby College Museum of Art
Board Member of US Friends of The Van Leer Jerusalem Institute
Member of Selection Advisory Council for Greenlight Fund
Former Trustee and Board President of the Winsor School


Nancy Gardiner’s Comments on Working with Families and Philanthropy
“Most of my clients are individuals and families. For many, I am ‘first call’ for questions – no issue is too big or too small. I work with clients on the whole picture. This includes how to talk to children about family wealth, or how to transition wealth from one generation to the next while achieving important philanthropic goals. I also work with nonprofit organizations, a natural fit given my personal commitment to volunteer work. Issues include governance, and structuring gifts in a tax sensitive way that respects the wishes of all the parties involved. Listening is important to me. I am satisfied only when I hear my clients tell me that I’ve exceeded their expectations.”
Philanthropy Blog
 







Private Client Services

Estate & Tax PlanningEstate & Trust AdministrationFamily BusinessFamily OfficePhilanthropic Advisory ServicesTrustees 


Legal Services

Estate Planning, Probate & TrustNonprofit RepresentationOwner-Led Business 


Education


JD, University of Virginia School of Law (Editorial staff of The Virginia Tax Review)
AB, Harvard University (magna cum laude)
 


Bar Admissions

Massachusetts 


Memberships

Boston Bar AssociationMassachusetts Bar Association 


News

Charles Fayerweather is Editor of the new edition of “Massachusetts Nonprofit Organizations”Philanthropy across generations: creating a strategic roadmap 


Events

31st Annual Gifft Hill School AuctionBoston Investors Dinner – Gratitude Railroad Dinner SeriesCancer Support Community – Massachusetts South Shore, Festival of Wreaths 2016Health Law Advocates 21st Annual Benefit BreakfastNancy B. Gardiner will be a featured panelist at the October 2016 “Leading by Example: Best Practices in Charitable Giving”Health Law Advocates 20th Annual Benefit Breakfast 























© 2017 Hemenway & Barnes


Full Site Version

Site MapDisclaimer 
TwitterLinkedIn









X
Disclaimer
Communications Policy for Hemenway & Barnes
Thank you for your interest in Hemenway & Barnes, but merely communicating with Hemenway & Barnes LLP or a Hemenway & Barnes lawyer or employee will not create a lawyer-client relationship. Such a relationship will not arise unless and until the firm agrees with you in writing to handle a particular matter. Unless and until this has occurred, you should not convey to us any information you regard as personal or confidential, because any such information will not be treated by us as confidential or subject to any confidentiality requirements.
Our website offers several opportunities for visitors to request information. We use this contact information to send users information about our firm and their selected areas of interest. We may not be able to respond to your request for a variety of reasons, but appreciate your interest in our firm.

I Agree
I Disagree













Gardiner Nancy B | Gardiner Nancy B Portfolio - 2017 Stock Picks and Performances 





























Home




 Homepage


 Membership Levels


 Membership Data Coverage


 Complete Stock List


 Founder's Message


 The Book


 FREE Trial






Screeners


Value Screens 


 All-In-One Screener


 Industry Overview


 Ben Graham Net-Net


 Undervalued Predictable


 Buffett-Munger Screener


 Magic Formula (Greenblatt)


 Historical Low P/S List


 Historical Low P/B List


 Peter Lynch Screen


 High Short Interest


 52-Week/3Y/5Y Lows


 52-Week/3Y/5Y Highs


 Predictable Companies


 S&P 500 Grid


 Dividend Stocks


 Spin Off List




Downloads | Tools


  Excel Add-In GURUF


 Manual of Stocks™


 Download Financial Data


 Download Guru Portfolios


 Download Stock PDFs


 Download Insider Data


  API


 Mobile App




Strategies


 Performances


 Buffett-Munger


 Undervalued Predictable


 Low P/S


 Low P/B


 Broadest Owned


 Most Weighted






Gurus




 Latest Guru Picks


 Real Time Picks


 List of Gurus (Personalize)


 Gurus Portfolios


 Scoreboard


 Top 10 Holdings View


 Sector Picks


 International Picks


 Aggregated Portfolio


 Consensus Picks


 Guru Bargains


 Hot Picks


 Industry Trends


 Geographic Trend


 ETFs


 Options


 European Shorting






Insiders




 All Insiders


 CEO Buys/Sales


 CFO Buys/Sales


 Insider Cluster


 Guru+Insider Double Buys


 Triple Buys/Sales


 Insider Trends


 Canadian Insider


 Dutch Insider






Market


Market Valuation


 Economic Data


 Industry Overview


 Market-Cap/GDP Valuation


 Global Market Valuation


 Shiller P/E


 Shiller P/E By Sectors


 Buffett Assets Allocation




By Country


 USA


 Australia


 Canada


 China


 Germany


 India


 Japan


 UK


 More...






Articles


Articles


 Editor's Picks


 GuruFocus Research


 Value Ideas


 Interviews with Gurus


 Top Ranked


 Value Idea Contest


 Videos


 Following Authors




Submit Articles


 Writers Wanted


 Value Contest Winners


 Submit Articles Online


 My Articles






Conference




 Value Conference


 Speakers


 Location/Venue


 Register


 After Conference Gathering (Free Drinks)






Tutorials




 Tutorials & Webinars


 FAQ


 Contact Us






Log In




 Free Sign-up


 Log In


 7-Day Free Trial 






Subscribe




 Free Trial ($399/Year)


 Refer a Friend & Earn $50














Warren Buffett


Bruce Berkowitz


George Soros


Seth Klarman


David Tepper


John Paulson


David Einhorn


Mohnish Pabrai


Prem Watsa


Bill Ackman


Joel Greenblatt


Carl Icahn


Arnold Schneider


Arnold Van Den Berg


Barrow, Hanley, Mewhinney & Strauss


Bill Ackman


Bill Gates


Bill Nygren


Bruce Berkowitz


Carl Icahn


Full Gurus List




Gurus List





Search
Compare

Search ▾










Get 7-Day Free Trial



My Portfolios▾
                        
Portfolios Overview
Create New Portfolio
Portfolio Contest


My Gurus▾
                        
Quick Browse
Personalize

My Gurus

Premium Gurus 
Premium Plus Investors 























Gardiner Nancy B 

                Last Update: 07-26-2017 
            





                    Number of Stocks: 51

                    Number of New Stocks: 1




                    Total Value: $48 Mil

                    Q/Q Turnover: 9%


Countries:
                
 











This content requires JavaScript.

Details: Top Buys | Top Sales | Top Holdings  Embed:  



Bookmark

Print


Tweet















Bookmark Name:









			This page was added to your Bookmark.
		



Members Only. Please Sign Up or Log In first.




			Bookmark of this page has been deleted.
		




Add to Personalized Guru List
Remove from Personalized Guru List
RSS Update




LatestStock PicksCurrent PortfolioProfile/PerformanceSector Weighting




Gardiner Nancy B has been successfully added into your Personalized Guru List.
        



Gardiner Nancy B has been removed from your Personalized Guru List.
        



            This feature is only available for Premium Members, please sign up for
            GuruFocus Premium Membership

7-Day Free Trial Now





Gardiner Nancy B has been successfully added into Guru Email Alerts list.
        



Gardiner Nancy B has been removed from Guru Email Alerts list.
        



This feature is only available for Members, please Sign Up for FREE membership.
                If you have already signed up, please Log In






Gardiner Nancy B's Portfolio is for Premium Plus  Membership subscribers only.

	
	GuruFocus Premium Plus  Membership
(This is a new feature)


 Gain access to the portfolios and trades of ALL 13F filers
 Their trading history
 Aggregated portfolio of any combinations among them
 Email alerts
 Excel Add-in for fully customized data downloads and research
 API for Guru/Insider data downloads (Realtime & historical)


7-Day Free Trial
Learn more








Add Notes, CommentsIf you want to ask a question or report a bug, please create a support ticket.






Select portfolio(s):








                        Create a new portfolio



Why you are interested?



            Your selection and notes will be stored in your portfolio.
        


Login to add portfolio















Get WordPress Plugins for easy affiliate links on Stock Tickers and Guru Names
                    | Earn affiliate commissions by embedding GuruFocus Charts

                                                GuruFocus Affiliate Program: Earn up to $400 per referral.  ( Learn More) 













Home  About   Jobs    Advertise    Site Map    Term of Use    Privacy Policy     RSS    Mobile App     Email Alerts    Referral Program    Affiliate Program    FAQ    Contact Us
                               

                © 2004-2017                GuruFocus.com, LLC. All Rights Reserved.
            


                    Disclaimers: GuruFocus.com is not operated by a broker, a dealer, or a registered investment adviser. Under no circumstances does any information posted on GuruFocus.com represent a recommendation to buy or sell a security. The information on this site, and in its related newsletters, is not intended to be, nor does it constitute, investment advice or recommendations. The gurus may buy and sell securities before and after any particular article and report and information herein is published, with respect to the securities discussed in any article and report posted herein. In no event shall GuruFocus.com be liable to any member, guest or third party for any damages of any kind arising out of the use of any content or other material published or available on GuruFocus.com, or relating to the use of, or inability to use, GuruFocus.com or any content, including, without limitation, any investment losses, lost profits, lost opportunity, special, incidental, indirect, consequential or punitive damages. Past performance is a poor indicator of future performance. The information on this site, and in its related newsletters, is not intended to be, nor does it constitute, investment advice or recommendations. The information on this site is in no way guaranteed for completeness, accuracy or in any other way. The gurus listed in this website are not affiliated with GuruFocus.com, LLC.



                    Stock quotes provided by InterActive Data. Fundamental company data provided by Morningstar, updated daily.


















GF Chat {{numOfNotice}}




























×
Manage BookMarks





Close








FEEDBACK




































Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage Very Likely to Impact HealthSouth Corp (HLS) Share Price - BNB Daily












 
















 

 

Home » Investing



Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage Very Likely to Impact HealthSouth Corp (HLS) Share Price

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about HealthSouth Corp (NYSE:HLS) has trended somewhat positive this week, Accern Sentiment Analysis reports. The research group scores the sentiment of news coverage by reviewing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Foster Wheeler AG (NASDAQ:FWLT) Given Daily Media Impact Score of 0.27

Posted by Tim Parker on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Press coverage about Foster Wheeler AG (NASDAQ:FWLT) has trended positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. Accern identifies negative and positive media coverage by analyzing more than 20 million blog and news sources in real-time....  




Federal Signal Corporation (NYSE:FSS) Receiving Favorable Press Coverage, Report Finds

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media coverage about Federal Signal Corporation (NYSE:FSS) has been trending positive this week, Accern reports. The research group identifies negative and positive news coverage by analyzing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Ford Motor (F) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Study Shows

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media headlines about Ford Motor (NYSE:F) have been trending somewhat positive on Thursday, according to Accern Sentiment. The research group scores the sentiment of media coverage by monitoring more than 20 million news and blog sources...  




Gentex Corporation (NASDAQ:GNTX) Receives Media Impact Score of 0.14

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News headlines about Gentex Corporation (NASDAQ:GNTX) have trended somewhat positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. The research firm identifies positive and negative media coverage by reviewing more than 20 million blog and...  




Genesis Energy, L.P. (GEL) Given Daily Coverage Optimism Score of 0.07

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media coverage about Genesis Energy, L.P. (NYSE:GEL) has been trending somewhat positive this week, Accern reports. The research group identifies negative and positive news coverage by analyzing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Favorable News Coverage Likely to Impact GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK) Share Price

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK) has been trending positive on Thursday, Accern Sentiment reports. Accern ranks the sentiment of news coverage by analyzing more than 20 million news and blog sources. Accern ranks...  




Newmont Mining Corporation (NEM) Upgraded to “Outperform” at Scotiabank

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Newmont Mining Corporation (NYSE:NEM) was upgraded by stock analysts at Scotiabank from a “sector perform” rating to an “outperform” rating in a report released on Wednesday, July 5th. The brokerage presently...  




Kohl’s Corporation (KSS) Upgraded by BidaskClub to Hold

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Kohl’s Corporation (NYSE:KSS) was upgraded by stock analysts at BidaskClub from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Wednesday, July 5th.
A number of other brokerages have...  




Marathon Oil Corporation (NYSE:MRO) Upgraded to “Buy” by Citigroup Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Citigroup Inc. upgraded shares of Marathon Oil Corporation (NYSE:MRO) from a neutral rating to a buy rating in a research note released on Wednesday, July 5th, MarketBeat.com reports. The brokerage currently has $15.00 price objective...  




AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (NYSE:MITT) Stock Rating Lowered by Zacks Investment Research

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (NYSE:MITT) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report issued on Wednesday, July 5th.
According to Zacks, “AG Mortgage...  




Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (ADM) Receives “Hold” Rating from BMO Capital Markets

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (NYSE:ADM)‘s stock had its “hold” rating reiterated by analysts at BMO Capital Markets in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, June 27th. They currently have a $41.00 price objective...  




Zacks Investment Research Lowers Guidance Software, Inc. (NASDAQ:GUID) to Hold

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Guidance Software, Inc. (NASDAQ:GUID) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, July 4th.
According to Zacks, “GUIDANCE...  




Black Box Corporation (BBOX) Rating Increased to Buy at Sidoti

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Sidoti upgraded shares of Black Box Corporation (NASDAQ:BBOX) from a neutral rating to a buy rating in a research note published on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat Ratings reports. Sidoti currently has $10.00 price objective on the...  




Mizuho Lowers Jazz Pharmaceuticals PLC (NASDAQ:JAZZ) to Neutral

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Mizuho downgraded shares of Jazz Pharmaceuticals PLC (NASDAQ:JAZZ) from a buy rating to a neutral rating in a research note published on Tuesday, July 4th, StockTargetPrices.com reports. Mizuho currently has $150.00 price objective...  




Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT) Upgraded to “Hold” by Zacks Investment Research

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “strong sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, July 4th.
According to Zacks, “Harmonic designs,...  




Alphabet Inc. (GOOGL) Receives “Buy” Rating from Cantor Fitzgerald

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Cantor Fitzgerald restated their buy rating on shares of Alphabet Inc. (NASDAQ:GOOGL) in a research note published on Tuesday, June 27th, Marketbeat Ratings reports. Cantor Fitzgerald currently has a $1,070.00 price objective on the...  




Sysco Corporation’s (SYY) “Buy” Rating Reiterated at BMO Capital Markets

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Sysco Corporation (NYSE:SYY)‘s stock had its “buy” rating reiterated by analysts at BMO Capital Markets in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat Ratings reports. They currently have a $60.00...  




Somewhat Positive Media Coverage Very Likely to Impact Praxair (PX) Share Price

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about Praxair (NYSE:PX) has trended somewhat positive on Thursday, according to Accern Sentiment. Accern identifies negative and positive press coverage by analyzing more than 20 million blog and news sources in real-time....  




LyondellBasell Industries NV (LYB) Given Consensus Rating of “Hold” by Analysts

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Shares of LyondellBasell Industries NV (NYSE:LYB) have received an average recommendation of “Hold” from the twenty-one research firms that are currently covering the firm, Marketbeat Ratings reports. One research analyst...  




Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) Given Consensus Rating of “Buy” by Brokerages

Posted by Renee Johnson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) has been assigned a consensus recommendation of “Buy” from the seven ratings firms that are covering the company, MarketBeat reports. One analyst has rated the stock...  




Rice Energy Inc. (RICE) Rating Lowered to Hold at KLR Group

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

KLR Group lowered shares of Rice Energy Inc. (NYSE:RICE) from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research report report published on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat reports. They currently have $27.00 price target on the oil and gas...  




$0.39 Earnings Per Share Expected for Axalta Coating Systems Ltd (NASDAQ:AXTA) This Quarter

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Wall Street brokerages forecast that Axalta Coating Systems Ltd (NASDAQ:AXTA) will announce earnings per share of $0.39 for the current quarter, according to Zacks Investment Research. Four analysts have provided estimates for Axalta...  




Eagle Materials Inc (EXP) Expected to Post Earnings of $1.17 Per Share

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Equities analysts expect Eagle Materials Inc (NYSE:EXP) to report earnings of $1.17 per share for the current fiscal quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Two analysts have provided estimates for Eagle Materials’ earnings,...  




Marathon Patent Group (NASDAQ:MARA) and Advanced Disposal Services (ADSW) Head to Head Analysis

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Marathon Patent Group (NASDAQ: MARA) and Advanced Disposal Services (NASDAQ:ADSW) are both finance companies, but which is the superior investment? We will contrast the two companies based on the strength of their earnings, dividends,...  




Levin Capital Strategies L.P. Sells 669,521 Shares of Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (TMO)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Levin Capital Strategies L.P. cut its position in Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (NYSE:TMO) by 91.5% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 62,473...  




Phillips 66 (PSX) Shares Sold by South State Corp

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

South State Corp cut its position in Phillips 66 (NYSE:PSX) by 19.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 49,006 shares of the oil and gas company’s...  




Mirae Asset Global Investments Co. Ltd. Sells 7,102 Shares of Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) (GS)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Mirae Asset Global Investments Co. Ltd. decreased its position in shares of Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) (NYSE:GS) by 19.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The institutional...  




General Mills, Inc. (GIS) Stake Increased by Blue Chip Partners Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Blue Chip Partners Inc. raised its position in General Mills, Inc. (NYSE:GIS) by 3.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 16,110 shares...  




Caterpillar, Inc. (CAT) Position Maintained by Pettee Investors Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Pettee Investors Inc. continued to hold its position in shares of Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 2,332 shares...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.25 Million Stake in Imperial Oil Ltd (IMO)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC increased its position in shares of Imperial Oil Ltd (NYSEMKT:IMO) (TSE:IMO) by 4.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission...  




Citigroup Inc. (C) Stake Decreased by NEXT Financial Group Inc

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

NEXT Financial Group Inc reduced its position in shares of Citigroup Inc. (NYSE:C) by 31.0% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the SEC. The institutional investor owned 14,080 shares of the financial...  




Essex Financial Services Inc. Has $261,000 Position in FedEx Corporation (FDX)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Essex Financial Services Inc. increased its stake in FedEx Corporation (NYSE:FDX) by 14.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The fund owned 1,335 shares of the shipping service provider’s...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.28 Million Stake in W.R. Grace & Co. (GRA)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC raised its stake in shares of W.R. Grace & Co. (NYSE:GRA) by 30.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)....  




Omnia Family Wealth LLC Maintains Position in Medtronic PLC (MDT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Omnia Family Wealth LLC continued to hold its stake in shares of Medtronic PLC (NYSE:MDT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 3,836 shares of...  




Eagle Asset Management Inc. Cuts Position in Medtronic PLC (MDT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Eagle Asset Management Inc. lowered its stake in shares of Medtronic PLC (NYSE:MDT) by 11.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned...  




Warren Averett Asset Management LLC Takes Position in Duke Energy Corporation (DUK)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Warren Averett Asset Management LLC bought a new stake in shares of Duke Energy Corporation (NYSE:DUK) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.33 Million Stake in BancorpSouth, Inc. (BXS)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC raised its stake in shares of BancorpSouth, Inc. (NYSE:BXS) by 4.3% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The...  




HubSpot, Inc. (HUBS) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. increased its position in shares of HubSpot, Inc. (NYSE:HUBS) by 1.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 75,500...  




Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc. (KLIC) Earns “Buy” Rating from B. Riley

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

B. Riley reaffirmed their buy rating on shares of Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc. (NASDAQ:KLIC) in a report released on Thursday, June 29th. B. Riley currently has a $31.00 price target on the semiconductor company’s stock.
A...  




VCA Inc. (WOOF) Lifted to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

VCA Inc. (NASDAQ:WOOF) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a report issued on Thursday, June 29th.
According to Zacks, “VCA Inc. is a national animal healthcare...  




Cray Inc (CRAY) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. raised its position in shares of Cray Inc (NASDAQ:CRAY) by 4.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 212,960...  




149,273 Shares in Premier, Inc. (PINC) Acquired by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. acquired a new position in Premier, Inc. (NASDAQ:PINC) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund acquired 149,273 shares of the...  




Cypress Semiconductor Corporation (CY) Raised to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Cypress Semiconductor Corporation (NASDAQ:CY) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a report issued on Thursday, June 29th. The brokerage presently has a $15.00...  




Intertek Group plc (ITRK) Downgraded to Neutral at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Intertek Group plc (LON:ITRK) was downgraded by research analysts at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) to a “neutral” rating in a note issued to investors on Monday, July 3rd, Marketbeat reports. They currently have a GBX...  




Beaufort Securities Downgrades Fox Marble Holdings PLC (FOX) to Hold

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Beaufort Securities downgraded shares of Fox Marble Holdings PLC (LON:FOX) to a hold rating in a research report sent to investors on Monday, July 3rd.
Shares of Fox Marble Holdings PLC (LON:FOX) traded up 0.000% on Monday, hitting...  




VASCO Data Security International, Inc. (VDSI) Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

VASCO Data Security International, Inc. (NASDAQ:VDSI) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report issued to clients and investors on Thursday, June...  




General Mills, Inc. (GIS) Earns “Equal Weight” Rating from Morgan Stanley

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Morgan Stanley restated their equal weight rating on shares of General Mills, Inc. (NYSE:GIS) in a research report sent to investors on Sunday, June 25th. Morgan Stanley currently has a $55.00 price target on the stock, down from...  




Ball Co. (NYSE:BLL) Rating Reiterated by Jefferies Group LLC

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ball Co. (NYSE:BLL)‘s stock had its “buy” rating restated by analysts at Jefferies Group LLC in a research note issued to investors on Sunday, June 25th. They presently have a $47.00 price objective on the industrial...  




$7.06 Billion in Sales Expected for Philip Morris International Inc (PM) This Quarter

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Brokerages expect Philip Morris International Inc (NYSE:PM) to post $7.06 billion in sales for the current fiscal quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Two analysts have provided estimates for Philip Morris International’s...  


Next » 














Free Email Newsletter
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor your stocks with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Thermo Fisher Scientific (TMO) Receiving Somewhat Favorable News Coverage, Analysis Shows
Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Limited (TEVA) Receives Daily Media Sentiment Rating of 0.41
PNC Financial Services Group, Inc. (The) (PNC) Position Raised by Delta Lloyd NV
Rogers Corporation (ROG) Position Cut by Prudential Financial Inc.
TJX Companies, Inc. (The) (TJX) Shares Bought by Mason Street Advisors LLC
Becton, Dickinson and Company (BDX) Position Raised by Wealthsource Partners LLC
Nordea Investment Management AB Sells 889,163 Shares of Stryker Corporation (SYK)
Orbotech Ltd. (ORBK) Shares Bought by Envestnet Asset Management Inc.
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Sells 11 Shares of Cubic Corporation (CUB)
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Acquires 2,349 Shares of Vipshop Holdings Limited (VIPS)
Premier Asset Managment LLC Has $369,000 Position in Accenture PLC (ACN)
Allergan PLC. (AGN) Shares Sold by Mayo Investment Advisers LLC
Select Medical Holdings Corporation (SEM) Shares Bought by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Bemis Company, Inc. (BMS) Shares Sold by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Prudential Financial Inc. Acquires 72 Shares of ESCO Technologies Inc. (ESE)
Prudential Financial Inc. Sells 1,732 Shares of Woodward, Inc. (WWD)
JPMorgan Chase & Co. Acquires 249,725 Shares of Enbridge Energy Management LLC (EEQ)
USS Investment Management Ltd Has $22,858,000 Position in General Dynamics Corporation (GD)
Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN) SVP Sells $29,984.00 in Stock
GTT Communications, Inc. (NYSE:GTT) Expected to Post Earnings of -$0.03 Per Share


 

























Unilever PLC (NYSE:UL) Position Increased by Broderick Brian C | Daily Political










































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















Unilever PLC - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Unilever PLC with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



Unilever PLC (NYSE:UL) Position Increased by Broderick Brian C					

Black Hills Corporation (BKH) Stake Maintained by Broderick Brian C					

Broderick Brian C Acquires 40 Shares of Illumina, Inc. (ILMN)					

Broderick Brian C Purchases 868 Shares of Canadian National Railway Company (CNI)					

Donaldson Company, Inc. (NYSE:DCI) Shares Sold by Broderick Brian C					

Farmers & Merchants Investments Inc. Has $2.02 Million Stake in Core Laboratories N.V. (NYSE:CLB)					

Farmers & Merchants Investments Inc. Boosts Stake in Edwards Lifesciences Corporation (EW)					

Page Arthur B Sells 70 Shares of McCormick & Company, Incorporated (NYSE:MKC)					

Farmers & Merchants Investments Inc. Continues to Hold Position in Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP)					

Farmers & Merchants Investments Inc. Raises Stake in Eaton Vance Corporation (EV)					

ICON PLC (NASDAQ:ICLR) Position Raised by Farmers & Merchants Investments Inc.					

Farmers & Merchants Investments Inc. Purchases 5,915 Shares of AptarGroup, Inc. (NYSE:ATR)					

Invuity (IVTY) versus Unilife Corp (UNIS) Financial Analysis					

Critical Survey: Flamel Technologies (AVDL) versus Acura Pharmaceuticals (NASDAQ:ACUR)					

Comparing UNS Energy Corp (UNS) and NRG Yield (NYLD)					

Stanley Black & Decker, Inc. (NYSE:SWK) Stake Maintained by Ipswich Investment Management Co. Inc.					

ABB Ltd (ABB) Position Maintained by Ipswich Investment Management Co. Inc.					

Ipswich Investment Management Co. Inc. Lowers Stake in National Fuel Gas Company (NYSE:NFG)					

Page Arthur B Raises Stake in Unilever PLC (NYSE:UL)					

Energizer Holdings (NYSE:ENR) versus Ultralife Corporation (ULBI) Head-To-Head Comparison					





 





						Unilever PLC (NYSE:UL) Position Increased by Broderick Brian C					

						 July 24th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Patrick Bannon 


							Filed Under: Finance - SEC Filing Articles 







Tweet










Broderick Brian C increased its position in shares of  Unilever PLC (NYSE:UL) by 8.8% during the second quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional investor  owned 66,373 shares of the company’s stock after buying an additional 5,353 shares during the period. Unilever PLC accounts for approximately  1.3% of Broderick Brian C’s portfolio, making the stock its 29th largest position. Broderick Brian C’s holdings in Unilever PLC were worth $3,593,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
A number of other large investors also recently made changes to their positions in the stock. Sunbelt Securities Inc. increased its position in  Unilever PLC by 0.7% in the first quarter. Sunbelt Securities Inc. now owns 6,501 shares of the company’s stock valued at $321,000 after buying an additional 44 shares during the period.  Wetherby Asset Management Inc. increased its position in  Unilever PLC by 0.8% in the first quarter. Wetherby Asset Management Inc. now owns 7,130 shares of the company’s stock valued at $352,000 after buying an additional 57 shares during the period.  BTIM Corp. increased its position in  Unilever PLC by 1.8% in the second quarter. BTIM Corp. now owns 7,063 shares of the company’s stock valued at $382,000 after buying an additional 126 shares during the period.  HL Financial Services LLC increased its position in  Unilever PLC by 0.6% in the first quarter. HL Financial Services LLC now owns 22,811 shares of the company’s stock valued at $1,126,000 after buying an additional 132 shares during the period.  Finally, Bruderman Asset Management LLC increased its position in  Unilever PLC by 0.9% in the first quarter. Bruderman Asset Management LLC now owns 17,610 shares of the company’s stock valued at $869,000 after buying an additional 153 shares during the period. 8.52% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 
Shares of Unilever PLC (NYSE UL) traded down 1.2853% on Monday, hitting $56.3562. 503,833 shares of the stock traded hands. Unilever PLC has a 52-week low of $38.58 and a 52-week high of $57.07. The firm has a 50 day moving average price of $54.90 and a 200 day moving average price of $49.57. The firm has a market cap of $158.50 billion, a PE ratio of 24.1976 and a beta of 0.88. 




The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Wednesday, September 6th. Shareholders of record on Friday, August 4th will be paid a $0.409 dividend. This is a positive change from Unilever PLC’s previous quarterly dividend of $0.38. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, August 2nd. This represents a $1.64 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 2.87%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: This piece was  reported by Daily Political and is owned by of Daily Political. If you are viewing this piece on another website, it was illegally stolen and republished in violation of United States and international trademark & copyright laws. The legal version of this piece can be viewed at https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/07/24/unilever-plc-nyseul-position-increased-by-broderick-brian-c.html. 
Several research analysts have recently issued reports on the stock. UBS AG  restated a “neutral” rating on shares of Unilever PLC in a report on Monday, July 17th. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Unilever PLC from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $61.00 target price on the stock in a report on Saturday, June 24th. J P Morgan Chase & Co  restated a “neutral” rating on shares of Unilever PLC in a report on Tuesday, March 28th. Liberum Capital  restated a “hold” rating on shares of Unilever PLC in a report on Monday, March 27th. Finally, Seaport Global Securities cut their target price on shares of Unilever PLC from $28.00 to $26.00 in a report on Monday, April 3rd. Two equities research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, five have issued  a hold rating and six have issued  a buy rating to the company’s stock. Unilever PLC currently has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $43.50.
Unilever PLC Company Profile
Unilever PLC is a fast-moving consumer goods (FMCG) company. The Company’s segments include Personal Care, which primarily includes sales of skin care and hair care products, deodorants and oral care products; Foods, which primarily includes sales of soups, bouillons, sauces, snacks, mayonnaise, salad dressings, margarines and spreads; Home Care, which primarily includes sales of home care products, such as powders, liquids and capsules, soap bars and a range of cleaning products, and Refreshment, which primarily includes sales of ice cream and tea-based beverages.






Receive News & Ratings for Unilever PLC Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Unilever PLC and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 
























































﻿

























Crawford Investment Counsel Inc. Has $337,000 Stake in Oracle Corporation (ORCL) - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Oracle Corporation
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Oracle Corporation with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Financial Comparison: Titan Machinery (TITN) vs. Toro Company (The) (NYSE:TTC)
Global Eagle Entertainment (ENT) versus Liberty Media Corporation (NASDAQ:BATRK) Head to Head Comparison
Zacks Investment Research Downgrades GoDaddy Inc. (NYSE:GDDY) to Sell
Jefferies Group LLC Reiterates “Buy” Rating for Church & Dwight Company, Inc. (NYSE:CHD)
Wedbush Cuts Bed Bath & Beyond Inc. (NASDAQ:BBBY) Price Target to $38.00
Zacks Investment Research Downgrades Grand Canyon Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:LOPE) to Hold
Hammerson plc (LON:HMSO) Receives GBX 597.42 Consensus Target Price from Brokerages
MarineMax, Inc. (HZO) Receives Average Recommendation of “Hold” from Brokerages
Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage Extremely Likely to Affect Unifirst Corporation (UNF) Stock Price
Detour Gold Co. to Post Q2 2017 Earnings of $0.06 Per Share, Beacon Securities Forecasts (DGC)
Taro Pharmaceutical Industries (NYSE:TARO) Earning Somewhat Critical News Coverage, Report Finds
Spirit Realty Capital, Inc. (SRC) Stock Rating Upgraded by BidaskClub
Zacks Investment Research Lowers MSC Industrial Direct Company, Inc. (MSM) to Hold
Critical Review: Strayer Education (NASDAQ:STRA) vs. DeVry Education Group (ATGE)
Cherry Hill Mortgage Investment Corporation (NYSE:CHMI) Earns Daily Media Sentiment Rating of -0.12
Tenet Healthcare Corporation (THC) Receives $23.75 Average PT from Analysts
P H Glatfelter (GLT) vs. Neenah Paper (NYSE:NP) Critical Contrast
Rotork p.l.c. (ROR) Receives “Buy” Rating from Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)
Moneysupermarket.Com Group PLC (MONY) Receives Buy Rating from Shore Capital
Tractor Supply Company (NASDAQ:TSCO) Upgraded to Sell by BidaskClub


 


Crawford Investment Counsel Inc. Has $337,000 Stake in Oracle Corporation (ORCL)

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments 

Crawford Investment Counsel Inc. decreased its position in Oracle Corporation (NYSE:ORCL) by 0.9% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund owned 7,549 shares of the enterprise software provider’s stock after selling 70 shares during the period. Crawford Investment Counsel Inc.’s holdings in Oracle Corporation were worth $337,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
Other institutional investors have also recently modified their holdings of the company. Bank of New York Mellon Corp increased its stake in Oracle Corporation by 2.9% in the first quarter. Bank of New York Mellon Corp now owns 53,750,832 shares of the enterprise software provider’s stock worth $2,397,824,000 after buying an additional 1,521,879 shares during the period. Norges Bank bought a new stake in Oracle Corporation during the fourth quarter worth about $1,090,559,000. Boston Partners increased its stake in Oracle Corporation by 20.1% in the first quarter. Boston Partners now owns 18,234,179 shares of the enterprise software provider’s stock worth $813,427,000 after buying an additional 3,054,765 shares during the period. Russell Investments Group Ltd. increased its stake in Oracle Corporation by 6.2% in the first quarter. Russell Investments Group Ltd. now owns 13,008,544 shares of the enterprise software provider’s stock worth $580,371,000 after buying an additional 764,803 shares during the period. Finally, Fisher Asset Management LLC increased its stake in Oracle Corporation by 0.8% in the first quarter. Fisher Asset Management LLC now owns 11,724,599 shares of the enterprise software provider’s stock worth $523,034,000 after buying an additional 96,955 shares during the period. 58.65% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors. 


 Get Oracle Corporation alerts:



Oracle Corporation (ORCL) opened at 50.45 on Friday. The stock has a 50 day moving average of $48.77 and a 200-day moving average of $44.59. Oracle Corporation has a one year low of $37.62 and a one year high of $51.85. The stock has a market cap of $208.70 billion, a P/E ratio of 22.83 and a beta of 1.07. Oracle Corporation also was the target of some unusual options trading activity on Wednesday. Stock investors acquired 36,574 call options on the company. This represents an increase of 115% compared to the average volume of 17,031 call options.




Oracle Corporation (NYSE:ORCL) last issued its quarterly earnings data on Wednesday, June 21st. The enterprise software provider reported $0.89 earnings per share for the quarter, beating analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.78 by $0.11. Oracle Corporation had a net margin of 24.74% and a return on equity of 20.90%. The business had revenue of $10.94 billion for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $10.45 billion. During the same period in the previous year, the business earned $0.81 earnings per share. The company’s revenue was up 3.3% on a year-over-year basis. Analysts anticipate that Oracle Corporation will post $2.96 EPS for the current year. 
The business also recently disclosed a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Wednesday, August 2nd. Investors of record on Wednesday, July 19th will be paid a dividend of $0.19 per share. This represents a $0.76 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 1.51%. The ex-dividend date is Monday, July 17th. Oracle Corporation’s dividend payout ratio is currently 34.55%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: “Crawford Investment Counsel Inc. Has $337,000 Stake in Oracle Corporation (ORCL)” was first published by BNB Daily and is owned by of BNB Daily. If you are reading this news story on another domain, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of US and international copyright law. The legal version of this news story can be accessed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/28/crawford-investment-counsel-inc-has-337000-stake-in-oracle-corporation-orcl.html. 
A number of research firms have recently issued reports on ORCL. KeyCorp reissued a “buy” rating and issued a $61.00 price target on shares of Oracle Corporation in a research note on Tuesday, July 18th. MKM Partners reissued a “neutral” rating and issued a $48.00 price target (up from $45.00) on shares of Oracle Corporation in a research note on Friday, June 23rd. Cowen and Company reissued an “outperform” rating and issued a $55.00 price target (up from $48.00) on shares of Oracle Corporation in a research note on Thursday, June 22nd. Bank of America Corporation reissued a “buy” rating and issued a $62.00 price target (up from $54.00) on shares of Oracle Corporation in a research note on Thursday, June 22nd. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC reissued a “buy” rating and issued a $52.00 price target on shares of Oracle Corporation in a research note on Friday, April 7th. One research analyst has rated the stock with a sell rating, eleven have given a hold rating and thirty-one have given a buy rating to the company. Oracle Corporation currently has an average rating of “Buy” and a consensus target price of $50.70.
In related news, Director Hector Garcia-Molina sold 3,750 shares of Oracle Corporation stock in a transaction dated Monday, May 15th. The shares were sold at an average price of $45.25, for a total transaction of $169,687.50. Following the sale, the director now directly owns 8,281 shares in the company, valued at $374,715.25. The sale was disclosed in a document filed with the SEC, which is available through the SEC website. Also, insider Thomas Kurian sold 750,000 shares of Oracle Corporation stock in a transaction dated Tuesday, July 18th. The shares were sold at an average price of $50.46, for a total transaction of $37,845,000.00. Following the sale, the insider now owns 783,533 shares in the company, valued at $39,537,075.18. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Over the last 90 days, insiders have sold 2,211,581 shares of company stock worth $109,284,973. Company insiders own 29.00% of the company’s stock. 
About Oracle Corporation
Oracle Corporation (Oracle) provides products and services that address all aspects of corporate information technology (IT) environments, including application, platform and infrastructure. The Company’s businesses include cloud and on-premise software, hardware and services. Its cloud and on-premise software business consists of three segments, including cloud software and on-premise software, which includes Software as a Service (SaaS) and Platform as a Service (PaaS) offerings, cloud infrastructure as a service (IaaS) and software license updates and product support. 
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding ORCL? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Oracle Corporation (NYSE:ORCL).

 
Receive News & Ratings for Oracle Corporation Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Oracle Corporation and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 



































AptarGroup, Inc. (ATR) Stake Boosted by Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund | Daily Political










































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















AptarGroup Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for AptarGroup Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



AptarGroup, Inc. (ATR) Stake Boosted by Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund					

Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund Boosts Stake in Jabil Circuit, Inc. (NYSE:JBL)					

Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund Purchases 12,597 Shares of Bank of the Ozarks (OZRK)					

Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund Continues to Hold Stake in Moody’s Corporation (NYSE:MCO)					

Capital Product Partners L.P. (NASDAQ:CPLP) Shares Bought by Eqis Capital Management Inc.					

Zimmer Biomet Holdings, Inc. (ZBH) Stake Increased by CENTRAL TRUST Co					

Eqis Capital Management Inc. Buys Shares of 8,679 Olin Corporation (NYSE:OLN)					

Eqis Capital Management Inc. Boosts Stake in PennyMac Mortgage Investment Trust (PMT)					

Eqis Capital Management Inc. Boosts Stake in Banco Santander, S.A. (NYSE:SAN)					

iShares S&P NA Tec. Semi. Idx. Fd.(ETF) (SOXX) Shares Sold by Eqis Capital Management Inc.					

Nordstrom, Inc. (NYSE:JWN) Shares Bought by Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V.					

AbbVie Inc. (ABBV) Upgraded to Buy at Vetr Inc.					

Invuity, Inc. (IVTY) Receives Buy Rating from Piper Jaffray Companies					

Acacia Mining PLC (LON:ACA) Rating Lowered to Neutral at Credit Suisse Group					

Steven Madden, Ltd. (NASDAQ:SHOO) Rating Reiterated by Piper Jaffray Companies					

Autoliv, Inc. (ALV) Rating Reiterated by Piper Jaffray Companies					

Juniper Networks, Inc. (NYSE:JNPR) Given a $30.00 Price Target by Robert W. Baird Analysts					

State of Alaska Department of Revenue Has $340,000 Stake in Albemarle Corporation (ALB)					

Creative Planning Buys 31,826 Shares of Sandstorm Gold Ltd (SAND)					

Creative Planning Boosts Stake in Rice Midstream Partners LP (RMP)					





 





						AptarGroup, Inc. (ATR) Stake Boosted by Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund					

						 July 28th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Latisha Jones 


							Filed Under: Finance - SEC Filing Articles 







Tweet










Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund raised its stake in  AptarGroup, Inc. (NYSE:ATR) by 4.5% during the second quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The firm owned 23,096 shares of the industrial products company’s stock after buying an additional 994 shares during the period. Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund’s holdings in AptarGroup were worth $2,006,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Several other large investors have also made changes to their positions in ATR. BlackRock Inc. increased its stake in shares of  AptarGroup by 5,710.7% in the first quarter. BlackRock Inc. now owns 5,086,882 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $391,639,000 after buying an additional 4,999,339 shares during the period.  Norges Bank acquired a new stake in shares of  AptarGroup during the fourth quarter valued at about $33,791,000.  State Street Corp increased its stake in shares of  AptarGroup by 12.5% in the first quarter. State Street Corp now owns 3,400,146 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $261,776,000 after buying an additional 377,227 shares during the period.  Los Angeles Capital Management & Equity Research Inc. increased its stake in shares of  AptarGroup by 617.1% in the first quarter. Los Angeles Capital Management & Equity Research Inc. now owns 414,123 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $31,883,000 after buying an additional 356,377 shares during the period.  Finally, Vanguard Group Inc. increased its stake in shares of  AptarGroup by 6.4% in the first quarter. Vanguard Group Inc. now owns 5,868,657 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $451,828,000 after buying an additional 355,044 shares during the period. Institutional investors own  90.17% of the company’s stock. 
AptarGroup, Inc. (NYSE ATR) opened at 88.00 on Friday. The company’s 50 day moving average price is $87.58 and its 200-day moving average price is $79.99. The company has a market capitalization of $5.49 billion, a P/E ratio of 26.58 and a beta of 0.98. AptarGroup, Inc. has a 12-month low of $70.32 and a 12-month high of $90.79. 




AptarGroup (NYSE:ATR) last released its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, July 27th. The industrial products company reported $1.01 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.96 by $0.05. The firm had revenue of $617.75 million for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $624.74 million. AptarGroup had a net margin of 9.09% and a return on equity of 16.58%. The business’s quarterly revenue was down .4% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the prior year, the firm posted $0.91 earnings per share.  Equities analysts forecast that  AptarGroup, Inc. will post $3.45 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
The company also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Wednesday, August 16th. Stockholders of record on Wednesday, July 26th will be issued a $0.32 dividend. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Monday, July 24th. This represents a $1.28 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 1.45%. AptarGroup’s payout ratio is currently 38.67%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION NOTICE: This piece was first  posted by Daily Political and is owned by of Daily Political. If you are reading this piece on another publication, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of U.S. & international trademark & copyright law. The legal version of this piece can be viewed at https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/07/28/aptargroup-inc-atr-stake-boosted-by-oregon-public-employees-retirement-fund.html. 
ATR has been the subject of a number of research reports. Vertical Group downgraded AptarGroup from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating and increased their price objective for the stock from $68.00 to $70.00 in a report on Tuesday, May 2nd. Zacks Investment Research downgraded AptarGroup from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report on Monday, April 17th. Vertical Research downgraded AptarGroup from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report on Monday, May 1st. BMO Capital Markets  reiterated a “hold” rating and set a $79.00 price objective on shares of AptarGroup in a report on Sunday, July 2nd. Finally, KeyCorp  reiterated a “hold” rating on shares of AptarGroup in a report on Friday, June 23rd. Four analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, four have given a hold rating and two have assigned  a buy rating to the company’s stock. The stock presently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $82.60.
In other news, Director Maritza Gomez Montiel bought 1,720 shares of AptarGroup stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, May 5th. The shares were acquired at an average price of $82.00 per share, with a total value of $141,040.00. Following the completion of the purchase, the director now directly owns 7,116 shares in the company, valued at $583,512. The purchase was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available at this link. Also, Director King W. Harris sold 14,000 shares of the stock in a transaction on Wednesday, June 7th. The shares were sold at an average price of $85.43, for a total value of $1,196,020.00. Following the completion of the transaction, the director now directly owns 189,974 shares in the company, valued at approximately $16,229,478.82. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. In the last ninety days, insiders sold 251,726 shares of company stock worth $20,588,098. Insiders own  5.30% of the company’s stock. 
AptarGroup Company Profile
AptarGroup, Inc is a provider of a range of packaging, dispensing and sealing solutions, primarily for the beauty, personal care, homecare, prescription drug, consumer healthcare, injectables, food and beverage markets. The Company has manufacturing facilities located throughout the world, including North America, Europe, Asia and South America.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding ATR? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for AptarGroup, Inc. (NYSE:ATR).






Receive News & Ratings for AptarGroup Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for AptarGroup Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 



























































Xylem (NYSE:XYL) Stock Price, News & Analysis | MarketBeat






















    























































































Xylem Company Profile (NYSE:XYL)



  






Company Profile



Analyst Ratings



Earnings History



Earnings Estimates



Dividend History



Insider Trade



Headlines



Social Media



Chart






About Xylem (NYSE:XYL)
Xylem Inc. is a water technology company. The Company designs, manufactures and services engineered solutions across a range of critical applications. It is an equipment and service provider for water and wastewater applications with a portfolio of products and services addressing the cycle of water, from collection, distribution and use to the return of water to the environment. It has three business segments, which include Water Infrastructure, Applied Water and Sensus. Water Infrastructure focuses on the transportation, treatment and testing of water, offering a range of products, including water and wastewater pumps, and controls and systems. Applied Water serves the uses of water and focuses on the residential, commercial, industrial and agricultural markets. The Sensus segment's products include metering, networked communications, measurement and control technologies, software and services, including cloud-based analytics, remote monitoring and data management. 


Industry, Sector and Symbol:

Sector: Industrial Products
Industry: Pump & Pumping Equipment
Sub-Industry: Industrial Machinery
Symbol: NYSE:XYL
CUSIP: 98419M10
Web: www.xyleminc.com

Capitalization:Market Cap: $10.23 billionOutstanding Shares: 179,716,000Average Prices:50 Day Moving Avg: $55.16200 Day Moving Avg: $51.1752 Week Range: $45.60 - $57.85


P/E:Trailing P/E Ratio: 40.860Foreward P/E Ratio: 21.48P/E Growth: 1.780Sales & Book Value:Annual Revenue: $4 billionPrice / Sales: 2.56Book Value: $12.53 per sharePrice / Book: 4.54Dividend:Annual Dividend: $0.72Dividend Yield: 1.3%


Profitability:EBIDTA: $665 millionNet Margins: 6.75%Return on Equity: 15.53%Return on Assets: 6.14%Debt:Debt-to-Equity Ratio: 0.94%Current Ratio: 1.56%Quick Ratio: 1.11%Misc:Average Volume: 1.25 million shs.Beta: 1.18Short Ratio: 5.06

 

Frequently Asked Questions for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)
What is Xylem's stock symbol?

Xylem trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the ticker symbol "XYL."



How often does Xylem pay dividends? What is the dividend yield for Xylem?

Xylem declared a quarterly dividend on Thursday, May 11th. Investors of record on Thursday, May 25th will be paid a dividend of $0.18 per share on Wednesday, June 21st. This represents a $0.72 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 1.26%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Tuesday, May 23rd.  View Xylem's Dividend History.



How were Xylem's earnings last quarter?

Xylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) released its quarterly earnings data on Tuesday, May, 2nd. The company reported $0.39 earnings per share for the quarter, beating analysts' consensus estimates of $0.38 by $0.01. The firm earned $1.07 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $1.05 billion. Xylem had a return on equity of 15.53% and a net margin of 6.75%. The firm's revenue for the quarter was up 26.4% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period last year, the firm posted $0.35 earnings per share.  View Xylem's Earnings History.



When will Xylem make its next earnings announcement?

Xylem is scheduled to release their next quarterly earnings announcement on Tuesday, August, 1st 2017. View Earnings Estimates for Xylem.



What guidance has Xylem issued on next quarter's earnings?

Xylem issued an update on its FY17 earnings guidance on Tuesday, May, 2nd. The company provided earnings per share (EPS) guidance of $2.23-$2.38 for the period, compared to the Thomson Reuters consensus estimate of $2.29. The company issued revenue guidance of $4.50-$4.60 billion, compared to the consensus revenue estimate of $4.56 billion.



Where is Xylem's stock going? Where will Xylem's stock price be in 2017?

14 brokers have issued 12 month price targets for Xylem's stock. Their predictions range from $50.00 to $60.00. On average, they anticipate Xylem's stock price to reach $56.42 in the next year. View Analyst Ratings for Xylem.



What are analysts saying about Xylem stock?

Here are some recent quotes from research analysts about Xylem stock: 
1. According to Zacks Investment Research, "Over the last three months, Xylem's shares outperformed the Zacks categorized Machinery-General Industrial industry. Robust demand, greater innovation, increased end-market exposure and higher infrastructure spending of the government authorities in emerging countries (like India) are expected to bolster the company's revenues in the quarters ahead. In addition, solid top-line performances, greater productivity and increased cost discipline are likely to boost the company's profitability moving ahead. Notably, the company's strategic business buyouts are also anticipated to help in strengthening results in the quarters ahead. Over the last 60 days, the Zacks Consensus Estimate for the stock moved north for both 2017 and 2018, highlighting positive sentiments." (7/4/2017)
2. Cowen and Company analysts commented, "The April 4 Investor Day is likely an opportunity to dig in to Sensus cost/revenue synergies and recent discussions with customers on a truly unique total offering. We believe FY17/18 consensus is achievable despite some market concern that has affected the stock recently. Medium-term margin upside as Sensus is integrated and core business efficiency work continues. New $60 PT (up from $56)." (3/24/2017)




Who are some of Xylem's key competitors?

 Some companies that are related to Xylem include Sandvik AB (SDVKY), Tenaris S.A. (TS), Ball Corporation (BLL), TORAY INDS INC ADR(REP 10 (TRYIY), Cintas Corporation (CTAS), Norsk Hydro ASA (NHYDY), Dover Corporation (DOV), Pentair PLC. (PNR), Packaging Corporation of America (PKG), Fortune Brands Home & Security (FBHS), W.W. Grainger (GWW), Smith (A.O.) Corporation (AOS), AB SKF (SKFRY), IDEX Corporation (IEX), Sealed Air Corporation (SEE), Avery Dennison Corporation (AVY), Crown Holdings (CCK) and Allegion PLC (ALLE).



Who are Xylem's key executives?

Xylem's management team includes the folowing people: Markos I. Tambakeras I, Independent Chairman of the BoardPatrick K. Decker, President, Chief Executive Officer, DirectorE. Mark Rajkowski, Chief Financial Officer, Senior Vice PresidentKairus K. Tarapore, Chief Human Resource Officer, Senior Vice PresidentClaudia S. Toussaint, Senior Vice President, General Counsel, Corporate SecretaryD. Randall Bays, Senior Vice President and President - SensusTomas Brannemo, Senior Vice President and President - TransportDavid Flinton, Senior Vice President, President - DewateringPak Steven Leung, Senior Vice President and President - Emerging MarketsKenneth Napolitano, Senior Vice President, President - Applied Water Systems



Who owns Xylem stock?

Xylem's stock is owned by many different of retail and institutional investors. Top institutional shareholders include PGGM Investments (0.41%), AMF Pensionsforsakring AB (0.40%), Bank of Montreal Can (0.36%), Kornitzer Capital Management Inc. KS (0.35%), Handelsbanken Fonder AB (0.35%) and Russell Investments Group Ltd. (0.27%). Company insiders that own Xylem stock include Claudia S Toussaint, Colin R Sabol, Kenneth Napolitano, Markos I Tambakeras, Steven R Loranger and Tomas Brannemo. View Institutional Ownership Trends for Xylem.



Who sold Xylem stock? Who is selling Xylem stock?

Xylem's stock was sold by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Russell Investments Group Ltd., Braun Stacey Associates Inc., Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund, Suffolk Capital Management LLC, Handelsinvest Investeringsforvaltning, Municipal Employees Retirement System of Michigan, Private Asset Management Inc. and Exxonmobil Investment Management Inc. TX. Company insiders that have sold Xylem stock in the last year include Claudia S Toussaint, Colin R Sabol, Steven R Loranger and Tomas Brannemo. View Insider Buying and Selling for Xylem.



Who bought Xylem stock? Who is buying Xylem stock?

Xylem's stock was bought by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Bank of Montreal Can, DAVENPORT & Co LLC, Handelsbanken Fonder AB, Daiwa Securities Group Inc., NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V., Mitsubishi UFJ Asset Management UK Ltd., Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. and Sprott Inc..  View Insider Buying and Selling for Xylem.



How do I buy Xylem stock? 

Shares of Xylem can be purchased through any online brokerage account. Popular online brokerages include Vanguard Brokerage Services, TD Ameritrade, E*TRADE, Scottrade, Fidelity and Charles Schwab. 



What is Xylem's stock price today?

One share of Xylem stock can currently be purchased for approximately $56.93.


MarketBeat Community Rating for Xylem (NYSE XYL)Community Ranking:  2.3 out of 5 ( )Outperform Votes:  217 (Vote Outperform)Underperform Votes:  251 (Vote Underperform)Total Votes:  468MarketBeat's community ratings are surveys of what our community members think about Xylem and other stocks. Vote "Outperform" if you believe the stock will outperform the S&P 500 over the long term. Vote "Underperform" if you believe the stock will underperform the S&P 500 over the long term. You may vote once every thirty days.


Analyst Ratings
Consensus Ratings for Xylem (NYSE:XYL) (How are Consensus Ratings Calculated?) MarketBeat calculates consensus ratings using the most recent rating from each brokerage that has rated a stock within the last twelve months. Since brokers often use different ratings systems, each rating is normalized to a standardized rating score of 1 (sell), 2 (hold), 3 (buy) or 4 (strong buy). Consensus ratings scores are calculated using the mean average of the number of normalized sell, hold, buy and strong buy ratings. Each stock's consensus rating is derived from its calculated consensus ratings score (0-1.5 = Sell, 1.5-2.5 = Hold, 2.5-3.5 = Buy, >3.5 = Strong Buy). MarketBeat's consensus price targets are a mean average of the most recent available price targets set by each analyst that has set a price target for the stock in the last twelve months.MarketBeat will no longer include ratings and price target data in its consensus calculation if a broker drops coverage and MarketBeat has received a report that coverage was dropped. Ratings from certain research firms that issue ratings using purely quantitative methods (such as Zacks, Vetr and ValuEngine) are not included in consensus calculations. MarketBeat's consensus ratings and consensus price targets may differ from those calculated by other firms due to differences in methodology and available data.Ratings Breakdown: 4 Hold Ratings, 10 Buy RatingsConsensus Rating:Buy (Score: 2.71)Consensus Price Target: $56.42 (0.90% downside)

Analysts' Ratings History for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)

Show:  
Only the Most Recent Rating From Each Brokerage
All Ratings For This Stock


DateFirmActionRatingPrice TargetImpact on Share PriceDetails7/28/2017Canaccord GenuityReiterated RatingHold$50.00Low7/14/2017Stifel NicolausReiterated RatingHold$60.00Medium7/12/2017Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.Boost Price TargetOutperform$58.00 -> $60.00Low6/21/2017BMO Capital MarketsInitiated CoverageOutperform$60.00Low6/7/2017Boenning ScattergoodReiterated RatingBuy$55.00High5/15/2017Barclays PLCUpgradeEqual Weight -> Overweight$51.00 -> $59.00High5/10/2017CIBCReiterated RatingBuyLow3/24/2017Cowen and CompanyBoost Price TargetOutperform$56.00 -> $60.00Low3/12/2017Royal Bank Of CanadaReiterated RatingBuy$57.00Low3/8/2017Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)Initiated CoverageNeutral -> Neutral$52.00High2/1/2017GabelliDowngradeBuy -> HoldN/A11/17/2016Northcoast ResearchInitiated CoverageBuyN/A11/2/2016Janney Montgomery ScottUpgradeNeutral -> Buy$50.00 -> $52.00N/A8/22/2016Atlantic SecuritiesUpgradeNeutral -> Overweight$54.00N/A5/4/2016WedbushBoost Price TargetNeutral$41.00 -> $43.00N/A4/5/2016Sterne Agee CRTUpgradeNeutral -> BuyN/A4/1/2016Robert W. BairdReiterated RatingHoldN/A2/5/2016DA DavidsonBoost Price TargetNeutral$38.00N/A1/21/2016Susquehanna Bancshares IncLower Price Target$38.00 -> $37.00N/A1/21/2016Seaport Global SecuritiesUpgradeAccumulate -> Buy$40.00N/A(Data available from 7/28/2015 forward)


Earnings
Earnings History for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)Earnings History by Quarter for Xylem (NYSE XYL)DateQuarterConsensus EstimateActual EPSRevenue EstimateActual RevenueRelease LinkConference CallDetails8/1/2017$0.57N/A5/2/2017Q1 2017$0.38$0.39$1.05 billion$1.07 billionViewListen2/2/2017Q416$0.65$0.66$1.13 billion$1.10 billionViewListen11/1/2016Q316$0.53$0.54$913.53 million$897.00 millionViewListen8/2/2016Q216$0.47$0.48$927.69 million$932.00 millionViewListen5/3/2016Q116$0.34$0.35$832.03 million$847.00 millionViewListen2/4/2016Q415$0.60$0.60$997.15 million$994.00 millionViewListen10/29/2015Q315$0.48$0.49$897.80 million$902.00 millionViewListen7/30/2015Q215$0.43$0.43$924.98 million$920.00 millionViewListen4/30/2015Q115$0.31$0.33$840.60 million$837.00 millionViewListen2/5/2015Q414$0.61$0.62$1.03 billion$1.04 billionViewListen10/28/2014Q3$0.52$0.53$982.10 million$963.00 millionViewListen7/29/2014Q214$0.46$0.48$994.85 million$1.01 billionViewListen4/29/2014Q114$0.32$0.34$888.90 million$906.00 millionViewListen2/4/2014Q413$0.36$0.56$920.07 million$1.03 billionViewListen10/29/2013Q313$0.36$0.49$918.70 million$965.00 millionViewListen7/30/2013Q2 2013$0.44$0.36$967.90 million$960.00 millionViewListen4/30/2013Q1 2013$0.28$0.27$893.56 million$879.00 millionViewListen2/7/2013Q4 2012$0.46$0.47$980.57 million$969.00 millionViewListen11/1/2012Q312$0.43$0.44$924.00 million$931.00 millionViewN/A8/2/2012$0.49$0.49ViewN/A5/3/2012$0.37$0.36ViewN/A2/28/2012$0.45$0.40ViewN/A11/21/2011$0.43$0.55ViewN/A(Data available from 1/1/2011 forward)


Estimates
Earnings Estimates for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)2017 EPS Consensus Estimate: $2.312018 EPS Consensus Estimate: $2.66QuarterNumber of EstimatesLow EstimateHigh EstimateAverage EstimateQ1 20175$0.36$0.44$0.39Q2 20175$0.52$0.58$0.56Q3 20175$0.57$0.62$0.61Q4 20175$0.71$0.78$0.75Q1 20183$0.47$0.52$0.50Q2 20183$0.64$0.68$0.66Q3 20183$0.66$0.70$0.68Q4 20183$0.80$0.83$0.82(Data provided by Zacks Investment Research)


Dividends
Current Dividend Information for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)Most Recent Dividend:6/21/2017Annual Dividend:$0.72Dividend Yield:1.26%Dividend Growth:-0.10% (3 Year Average)Payout Ratio:50.35% (Trailing 12 Months of Earnings)  31.17% (Based on This Year's Estimates)27.17% (Based on Next Year's Estimates)Track Record:4 Years of Consecutive Dividend GrowthDividend History by Quarter for Xylem (NYSE XYL)AnnouncedPeriodAmountYieldEx-Dividend DateRecord DatePayable Date5/11/2017quarterly$0.181.41%5/23/20175/25/20176/21/20172/2/2017quarterly$0.181.48%2/14/20172/16/20173/15/201710/13/2016quarterly$0.151.25%11/7/201611/9/201612/7/20168/17/2016quarterly$0.151.23%8/29/20168/31/20169/21/20165/12/2016quarterly$0.151.44%5/23/20165/25/20166/22/20162/5/2016quarterly$0.151.69%2/16/20162/18/20163/16/201610/14/2015quarterly$0.141.62%11/2/201511/4/201512/2/20158/19/2015quarterly$0.141.72%8/31/20159/2/20159/23/20155/13/2015quarterly$0.141.52%5/26/20155/28/20156/24/20152/5/2015quarterly$0.141.6%2/13/20152/18/20153/18/201510/15/2014quarterly$0.131.5%10/27/201410/29/201412/3/20148/25/2014quarterly$0.131.36%9/8/20149/10/20149/24/20145/7/2014quarterly$0.131.37%5/19/20145/21/20146/18/20142/4/2014quarterly$0.131.44%2/14/20142/19/20143/19/201410/10/2013quarterly$0.121.66%10/21/201310/23/201312/11/20138/21/2013quarterly$0.121.91%8/30/20139/4/20139/18/20135/8/2013quarterly$0.121.67%5/20/20135/22/20136/19/20132/7/2013quarterly$0.121.72%2/15/20132/20/20133/20/2013(Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Insider Trades
Insider Trading and Institutional Ownership History for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)Insider Ownership Percentage: 0.75%Institutional Ownership Percentage: 85.91%Insider Trades by Quarter for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)Transaction DateInsider NameTitleBuy/SellNumber of SharesAverage Share PriceTotal TransactionDetails6/29/2017Steven R LorangerDirectorSell66,132$55.01$3,637,921.32  5/4/2017Tomas BrannemoInsiderSell14,080$50.36$709,068.80  2/28/2017Tomas BrannemoInsiderSell819$48.46$39,688.74  11/4/2016Claudia S ToussaintSVPSell5,300$47.27$250,531.00  9/8/2016Colin R SabolInsiderSell27,473$50.91$1,398,650.43  8/17/2016Tomas BrannemoInsiderSell8,524$50.06$426,711.44  8/11/2016Steven R LorangerDirectorSell33,887$48.11$1,630,303.57  7/28/2016Steven R LorangerDirectorSell32,246$48.01$1,548,130.46  6/1/2016Steven R LorangerDirectorSell50,000$44.52$2,226,000.00  5/27/2016Steven R LorangerDirectorSell50,000$44.67$2,233,500.00  5/12/2016Colin R SabolSVPSell39,265$42.91$1,684,861.15  5/5/2016Kenneth NapolitanoSVPSell10,246$41.58$426,028.68  3/9/2016Tomas BrannemoSVPSell7,964$38.03$302,870.92  11/12/2015Markos I. TambakerasDirectorSell2,025$36.73$74,378.25  11/5/2015Steven R. LorangerDirectorSell165,690$36.69$6,079,166.10  5/29/2015Colin R SabolSVPSell20,712$36.57$757,437.84  5/4/2015Michael T SpeetzenCFOSell18,000$36.82$662,760.00  3/13/2015Colin R SabolSVPSell20,000$34.61$692,200.00  3/9/2015Robyn T MingleSVPSell27,105$35.34$957,890.70  3/3/2015Kenneth NapolitanoSVPSell9,859$36.13$356,205.67  3/2/2015Markos I TambakerasDirectorSell2,454$36.16$88,736.64  11/25/2014Surya N MohapatraDirectorSell3,640$38.24$139,193.60  11/20/2014Robyn T MingleSVPSell24,298$37.41$908,988.18  11/12/2014Steven R LorangerDirectorSell100,000$37.51$3,751,000.00  3/7/2014Colin SabolSVPSell29,835$38.47$1,147,752.45  2/21/2014Michael SpeetzenCFOSell61,326$38.87$2,383,741.62  2/19/2014Curtis CrawfordDirectorSell5,660$38.53$218,079.80  2/19/2014John ConnollyCAOSell8,186$37.62$307,957.32  2/11/2014Markos TambakerasDirectorSell2,373$37.23$88,346.79  2/7/2014Kenneth NapolitanoSVPSell28,846$36.79$1,061,244.34  2/6/2014Angela BuonocoreSVPSell11,996$36.00$431,856.00  1/15/2014Steven LorangerCEOSell89,235$36.08$3,219,598.80  9/13/2013Curtis CrawfordDirectorSell2,480$26.95$66,836.00  7/9/2013Colin R SabolSVPSell10,981$28.67$314,825.27  9/14/2012Steven R LorangerDirectorSell72,300$25.45$1,840,035.00  9/12/2012Steven R LorangerDirectorSell48,300$25.18$1,216,194.00  8/21/2012Edward J LudwigDirectorBuy1,000$25.60$25,600.00  (Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Headlines
Headline Trends for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)


Latest Headlines for Xylem (NYSE:XYL)


Source:


All Sources
Trusted Sources
MarketBeat.com
Bloomberg
MarketWatch
Motley Fool
NASDAQ
Reuters
Seeking Alpha
The Street
The Wall Street Journal
Yahoo Finance




DateHeadlineXylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Given "Hold" Rating at Canaccord Genuitywww.americanbankingnews.com - July 28 at 4:39 PMElefante Mark B Buys Xilinx Inc, Analog Devices Inc, Xylem Inc, Sells Oracle Corp - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - July 27 at 9:51 AMZacks: Analysts Expect Xylem Inc. (XYL) Will Post Quarterly Sales of $1.17 Billionwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 26 at 1:24 PMXylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Scheduled to Post Quarterly Earnings on Tuesdaywww.americanbankingnews.com - July 25 at 7:28 AM Analysts Anticipate Xylem Inc. (XYL) Will Announce Earnings of $0.57 Per Sharewww.americanbankingnews.com - July 24 at 9:51 AMSwell Investing: Building A Portfolio Of Companies Make The World A Better Placewww.nasdaq.com - July 19 at 9:44 AMXylem Inc. Forecasted to Post Q2 2017 Earnings of $0.57 Per Share (NYSE:XYL)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 17 at 7:00 AMXylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Receives "Hold" Rating from Stifel Nicolauswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 15 at 12:28 PMBrokers Offer Predictions for Xylem Inc.'s Q3 2017 Earnings (NYSE:XYL)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 14 at 10:18 AMXylem to release second quarter 2017 financial results on August 1, 2017 - Business Wire (press release)www.businesswire.com - July 13 at 3:29 PMXylem to release second quarter 2017 financial results on August 1, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 11:29 AMWater Equipment And Services Stock Swimming At Top Of Buy Rangefinance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 11:29 AMOppenheimer Holdings, Inc. Boosts Xylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Price Target to $60.00www.americanbankingnews.com - July 12 at 2:25 PMStifel Nicolaus Reiterates "Hold" Rating for Xylem Inc (NYSE:XYL)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 6 at 9:36 PMXylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Receives Consensus Recommendation of "Buy" from Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 4 at 2:39 PMZacks Investment Research Upgrades Xylem Inc. (XYL) to Buywww.americanbankingnews.com - July 4 at 2:20 PMXylem (XYL) Hits a New 52-Week High: What's Driving It? - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - July 3 at 3:17 PMXylem (XYL) Hits a New 52-Week High: What's Driving It?finance.yahoo.com - July 3 at 3:17 PMXylem (XYL) Hits a New 52-Week High: What's Driving It?www.zacks.com - July 3 at 8:45 AMETFs with exposure to Xylem, Inc. : June 30, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 1 at 9:19 AMInsider Selling: Xylem Inc. (NYSE:XYL) Director Sells 66,132 Shares of Stockwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 30 at 7:14 PM$1.17 Billion in Sales Expected for Xylem Inc. (XYL) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 30 at 3:20 PMXylem Inc. (XYL) Upgraded to Buy by BidaskClubwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 28 at 3:14 PM$0.56 Earnings Per Share Expected for Xylem Inc. (XYL) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 28 at 8:02 AMXylem Inc. (XYL) Research Coverage Started at BMO Capital Marketswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 25 at 8:07 PMHead to Head Contrast: Franklin Electric Co. (FELE) and Xylem (XYL)www.americanbankingnews.com - June 24 at 8:24 PMXylem: Investing In The World's Most Important Commodity - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - June 22 at 2:54 PMXylem Inc. (XYL) PT Set at $58.00 by Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.www.americanbankingnews.com - June 21 at 11:22 PMNew York High School Students Win 2017 U.S. Stockholm Junior Water Prizefinance.yahoo.com - June 21 at 12:31 AMETFs with exposure to Xylem, Inc. : June 19, 2017finance.yahoo.com - June 20 at 9:27 AMXylem (XYL) vs. Flowserve Corporation (FLS) Head-To-Head Contrastwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 19 at 8:23 AMXylem, Inc. :XYL-US: Earnings Analysis: Q1, 2017 By the Numbers : June 16, 2017finance.yahoo.com - June 17 at 8:01 AMXylem publishes its 2016 Sustainability Report: Why We Solve Waterfinance.yahoo.com - June 14 at 4:26 PMXylem Inc (XYL) Upgraded by BidaskClub to "Hold"www.americanbankingnews.com - June 10 at 3:38 PMXylem Inc (XYL) Given Consensus Rating of "Buy" by Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 9 at 4:48 PMXylem Inc (XYL) Given "Buy" Rating at Boenning Scattergoodwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 7 at 8:20 AMXylem's (XYL) Future Prospects Encouraging Amid Macro Risksfinance.yahoo.com - June 7 at 1:25 AMXylem (XYL) Up 4.4% Since Earnings Report: Can It Continue? - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - June 5 at 9:30 AMXylem (XYL) Up 4.4% Since Earnings Report: Can It Continue?finance.yahoo.com - June 5 at 9:30 AM$1.17 Billion in Sales Expected for Xylem Inc (XYL) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 4 at 10:32 AM$0.56 EPS Expected for Xylem Inc (XYL) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 2 at 9:50 AMXylem Honored for Engaging Colleagues in Service Around the ... - Business Wire (press release)www.businesswire.com - June 2 at 7:56 AMXylem Honored for Engaging Colleagues in Service Around the Globefinance.yahoo.com - June 2 at 7:56 AMXylem affirms its strong support for the Paris Climate Agreementfinance.yahoo.com - June 2 at 7:56 AMXylem Inc (XYL) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Stifel Nicolauswww.americanbankingnews.com - May 27 at 11:30 AMXylem, Inc. : XYL-US: Dividend Analysis : May 25th, 2017 (record date) : By the numbers : May 24, 2017finance.yahoo.com - May 25 at 8:08 AMXylem (XYL) Presents At Electrical Products Group 2017 Annual Spring Conference - Slideshowseekingalpha.com - May 23 at 8:12 PMXylem Inc (XYL) Earns Buy Rating from Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.www.americanbankingnews.com - May 23 at 8:04 PMXylem Inc. (XYL) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for May 23, 2017 - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - May 23 at 8:03 AMInteresting XYL Put And Call Options For January 2018www.nasdaq.com - May 22 at 7:48 PM


Social





Chart
Xylem (XYL) Chart for Friday, July, 28, 2017




This page was last updated on 7/28/2017 by MarketBeat.com Staff






































































Meeder Asset Management Inc. Boosts Position in Rockwell Automation, Inc. (ROK) - Community Financial News














































 

















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings & News for Rockwell Automation Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Rockwell Automation Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @CFinancialNews








Top Stories

Boston Properties, Inc. (BXP) Receives Hold Rating from Jefferies Group LLC
EQT GP Holdings, LP (NYSE:EQGP) Receives Overweight Rating from Morgan Stanley
Goldcorp Inc. (NYSE:GG) Receives Hold Rating from Jefferies Group LLC
Harley-Davidson, Inc. (NYSE:HOG) PT Lowered to $55.00
Hikma Pharmaceuticals Plc (HIK) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Analysts
Rodman & Renshaw Increases BeyondSpring Inc. (BYSI) Price Target to $50.00
Phillips 66’s (PSX) Buy Rating Reiterated at Piper Jaffray Companies
BroadSoft, Inc. (NASDAQ:BSFT) Upgraded at ValuEngine
Chemours Company (The) (CC) Earns “Buy” Rating from Jefferies Group LLC
FY2017 EPS Estimates for Newfield Exploration Company Increased by Analyst (NFX)
Delek US Holdings, Inc. (NYSE:DK) Downgraded by Citigroup Inc.
Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd. (NYSE:RCL) Receives Average Rating of “Buy” from Analysts
Inseego Corp. (NASDAQ:INSG) Stock Rating Upgraded by ValuEngine
C&J Energy Services (NYSE:CJ) Earns News Sentiment Rating of 0.08
Pattern Energy Group Inc. (NASDAQ:PEGI) Raised to Strong-Buy at Zacks Investment Research
Yum! Brands, Inc. (NYSE:YUM) Receives Outperform Rating from Sanford C. Bernstein
Credit Suisse Group Reiterates “Buy” Rating for AECOM (ACM)
New York State Teachers Retirement System Has $105.12 Million Stake in Netflix, Inc. (NASDAQ:NFLX)
Analysts Set Capital Trust, Inc. (BXMT) PT at $34.00
Tupperware Brands Corporation (TUP) Stock Rating Lowered by Zacks Investment Research







Meeder Asset Management Inc. Boosts Position in Rockwell Automation, Inc. (ROK)

					Posted by Trent Williams on Jul 26th, 2017 // No Comments 


Meeder Asset Management Inc. increased its position in  Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK) by 110.9% during the second quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the SEC. The institutional investor  owned 5,917 shares of the industrial products company’s stock after buying an additional 3,111 shares during the period. Meeder Asset Management Inc.’s holdings in Rockwell Automation were worth $959,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Other institutional investors also recently made changes to their positions in the company. FMR LLC boosted its position in  Rockwell Automation by 334.6% in the fourth quarter. FMR LLC now owns 403,863 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $54,279,000 after buying an additional 310,928 shares during the period.  Bank of America Corp DE boosted its position in  Rockwell Automation by 27.0% in the first quarter. Bank of America Corp DE now owns 1,037,845 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $161,602,000 after buying an additional 220,675 shares during the period.  Wealth Enhancement Advisory Services LLC acquired a new position in  Rockwell Automation during the first quarter valued at about $1,315,000.  Suntrust Banks Inc. boosted its position in  Rockwell Automation by 3.1% in the first quarter. Suntrust Banks Inc. now owns 7,127 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $1,108,000 after buying an additional 216 shares during the period.  Finally, Columbia Partners L L C Investment Management boosted its position in  Rockwell Automation by 11.8% in the first quarter. Columbia Partners L L C Investment Management now owns 8,632 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $1,344,000 after buying an additional 912 shares during the period. 73.50% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get Rockwell Automation Inc. alerts:



Rockwell Automation, Inc. (ROK) opened at 163.10 on Wednesday. The company has a market cap of $21.01 billion, a P/E ratio of 27.22 and a beta of 1.17. Rockwell Automation, Inc. has a 12-month low of $111.52 and a 12-month high of $167.97. The firm has a 50-day moving average price of $162.76 and a 200-day moving average price of $155.21. 




Rockwell Automation (NYSE:ROK) last posted its earnings results on Wednesday, July 26th. The industrial products company reported $1.76 EPS for the quarter, beating the consensus estimate of $1.64 by $0.12. The firm had revenue of $1.60 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $1.58 billion. Rockwell Automation had a return on equity of 39.71% and a net margin of 12.88%. Rockwell Automation’s revenue for the quarter was up 8.5% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the prior year, the company posted $1.55 earnings per share.  On average, analysts forecast that  Rockwell Automation, Inc. will post $6.66 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Monday, September 11th. Investors of record on Monday, August 14th will be issued a $0.76 dividend. This represents a $3.04 annualized dividend and a yield of 1.86%. The ex-dividend date is Thursday, August 10th. Rockwell Automation’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is presently 50.75%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION WARNING: This report was originally  reported by Community Financial News and is owned by of Community Financial News. If you are accessing this report on another website, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of United States & international trademark & copyright legislation. The original version of this report can be viewed at https://www.com-unik.info/2017/07/26/meeder-asset-management-inc-acquires-3111-shares-of-rockwell-automation-inc-rok-updated.html. 
Several equities analysts have recently issued reports on ROK shares. Cowen and Company boosted their target price on Rockwell Automation from $125.00 to $140.00 and gave the company a “market perform” rating in a research note on Thursday, July 6th. Credit Suisse Group  reaffirmed a “hold” rating and issued a $155.00 price target on shares of Rockwell Automation in a research note on Thursday, April 27th. Gabelli raised Rockwell Automation from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a research note on Wednesday, April 19th. Stifel Nicolaus upped their price target on Rockwell Automation from $159.00 to $167.00 and gave the stock a “hold” rating in a research note on Friday, April 28th. Finally, Barclays PLC  set a $176.00 price target on Rockwell Automation and gave the stock a “buy” rating in a research note on Wednesday, April 26th. One equities research analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, thirteen have given a hold rating and three have given a buy rating to the company. Rockwell Automation currently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $148.53.
In other Rockwell Automation news, Director Keith D. Nosbusch sold 10,000 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Friday, May 5th. The stock was sold at an average price of $156.00, for a total transaction of $1,560,000.00. Following the transaction, the director now owns 411,286 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $64,160,616. The sale was disclosed in a filing with the SEC, which is accessible through the SEC website. Also, SVP Sujeet Chand sold 9,500 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Wednesday, May 31st. The stock was sold at an average price of $159.72, for a total value of $1,517,340.00. Following the transaction, the senior vice president now directly owns 46,873 shares in the company, valued at approximately $7,486,555.56. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders sold 129,605 shares of company stock worth $20,469,855 in the last three months. 1.65% of the stock is currently owned by corporate insiders. 
Rockwell Automation Company Profile
Rockwell Automation, Inc (Rockwell Automation) is a provider of industrial automation power, control and information solutions for manufacturers. The Company operates through two segments: Architecture & Software and Control Products & Solutions. The Architecture & Software segment contains various hardware, software and communication components of the Company’s integrated control and information architecture capable of controlling the customer’s industrial processes and connecting with their manufacturing enterprise.







What are top analysts saying about Rockwell Automation Inc.? - Enter your email address in the form below to receive our free daily email newsletter that contains the latest headlines and analysts' recommendations for for Rockwell Automation Inc. and related companies.



 



 





















Latest News




Boston Properties, Inc.  Receives Hold Rating from Jefferies Group LLC





EQT GP Holdings, LP  Receives Overweight Rating from Morgan Stanley





Goldcorp Inc.  Receives Hold Rating from Jefferies Group LLC





Harley-Davidson, Inc.  PT Lowered to $55.00





Hikma Pharmaceuticals Plc  Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Analysts





Rodman & Renshaw Increases BeyondSpring Inc.  Price Target to $50.00



Comments



Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 





































































Unilever NV (UN) Receives “Neutral” Rating from UBS AG - Watch List News



















































Home
About
Staff
Privacy Policy
Contact
























Headlines
Business
US News
Health
World
Investing
Technology




















Unilever NV - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Unilever NV with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow Watchlist News

 











Latest News



Landstar System, Inc. (NASDAQ:LSTR) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub					

Lowe’s Companies, Inc. (LOW) Rating Lowered to Strong Sell at BidaskClub					

BidaskClub Downgrades Lincoln Electric Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:LECO) to Buy					

KapStone Paper and Packaging Corporation (KS) Rating Increased to Buy at BidaskClub					

KLX Inc. (NASDAQ:KLXI) Downgraded to Hold at BidaskClub					

The KEYW Holding Corporation (KEYW) Downgraded by BidaskClub to “Sell”					

KAR Auction Services, Inc (NYSE:KAR) Lifted to Sell at BidaskClub					

Investors Bancorp, Inc. (NASDAQ:ISBC) Downgraded by BidaskClub to Strong Sell					

International Game Technology (NYSE:IGT) Upgraded by BidaskClub to “Hold”					

Hercules Capital, Inc. (NYSE:HTGC) Rating Lowered to Buy at BidaskClub					

J & J Snack Foods Corp. (JJSF) Stock Rating Upgraded by BidaskClub					

HD Supply Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:HDS) Raised to Sell at BidaskClub					

Inter Parfums, Inc. (IPAR) Rating Increased to Buy at BidaskClub					

Kaiser Aluminum Corporation (KALU) Rating Increased to Strong-Buy at BidaskClub					

Intel Corporation (NASDAQ:INTC) Lifted to Sell at BidaskClub					

Integra LifeSciences Holdings Corporation (IART) Downgraded by BidaskClub					

Intuitive Surgical, Inc. (ISRG) Downgraded by BidaskClub to Buy					

INC Research Holdings, Inc. (INCR) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub					

James River Group Holdings, Ltd. (NASDAQ:JRVR) Upgraded at BidaskClub					

HealthEquity, Inc. (HQY) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub					



Archives

July 2017
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
March 2016
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015
February 2015
January 2015
December 2014
November 2014
October 2014
September 2014
August 2014
July 2014
June 2014
May 2014
April 2014
March 2014
February 2014
January 2014




 




						Unilever NV (UN) Receives “Neutral” Rating from UBS AG					

						 July 21st, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Nicole Kennedy 


							Filed Under: Analyst Articles - US - Investing 






Tweet










UBS AG restated their neutral rating on shares of Unilever NV (NYSE:UN)  in a research note released on Monday, www.boersen-zeitung.de reports.
Other research analysts have also recently issued reports about the company. BidaskClub cut Unilever NV from a strong-buy rating to a buy rating in a research note on Saturday, June 10th. Zacks Investment Research upgraded Unilever NV from a hold rating to a buy rating and set a $65.00 price target on the stock in a research note on Tuesday, June 6th. Liberum Capital  restated a hold rating on shares of Unilever NV in a research note on Monday, March 27th. J P Morgan Chase & Co  restated a neutral rating on shares of Unilever NV in a research note on Tuesday, March 28th. Finally, Barclays PLC upgraded Unilever NV from an equal weight rating to an overweight rating in a research note on Friday, March 24th. Four research analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and seven have assigned  a buy rating to the company. The company presently has an average rating of Buy and an average target price of $49.50.
Shares of Unilever NV (NYSE UN) traded up 0.43% during midday trading on Monday, hitting $58.11. The company had a trading volume of 446,118 shares. The company has a 50-day moving average of $56.06 and a 200-day moving average of $50.05. Unilever NV has a 12 month low of $38.41 and a 12 month high of $58.16. The company has a market capitalization of $165.01 billion, a PE ratio of 27.96 and a beta of 0.90. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION NOTICE: “Unilever NV (UN) Receives “Neutral” Rating from UBS AG” was originally  published by Watch List News and is owned by of Watch List News. If you are accessing this story on another website, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of United States and international copyright laws. The correct version of this story can be viewed at https://www.watchlistnews.com/unilever-nv-un-receives-neutral-rating-from-ubs-ag/1454429.html. 




Several hedge funds have recently made changes to their positions in UN. BlackRock Inc. boosted its stake in shares of  Unilever NV by 416,585.0% in the first quarter. BlackRock Inc. now owns 9,167,071 shares of the company’s stock valued at $455,420,000 after buying an additional 9,164,871 shares during the last quarter.  FMR LLC boosted its stake in shares of  Unilever NV by 297.2% in the first quarter. FMR LLC now owns 11,804,556 shares of the company’s stock valued at $586,450,000 after buying an additional 8,832,563 shares during the last quarter.  Wellington Management Group LLP boosted its stake in shares of  Unilever NV by 22.6% in the first quarter. Wellington Management Group LLP now owns 21,933,059 shares of the company’s stock valued at $1,089,635,000 after buying an additional 4,042,634 shares during the last quarter.  Fort Washington Investment Advisors Inc. OH boosted its stake in shares of  Unilever NV by 9,088.7% in the first quarter. Fort Washington Investment Advisors Inc. OH now owns 1,411,193 shares of the company’s stock valued at $70,208,000 after buying an additional 1,395,835 shares during the last quarter.  Finally, United States Steel & Carnegie Pension Fund bought a new stake in shares of  Unilever NV during the first quarter valued at about $42,782,000. Institutional investors and hedge funds own  9.18% of the company’s stock. 
About Unilever NV
Unilever N.V. is a fast-moving consumer goods (FMCG) company. The Company’s segments include Personal Care, which primarily includes sales of skin care and hair care products, deodorants and oral care products; Foods, which primarily includes sales of soups, bouillons, sauces, snacks, mayonnaise, salad dressings, margarines and spreads; Home Care, which primarily includes sales of home care products, such as powders, liquids and capsules, soap bars and a range of cleaning products, and Refreshment, which primarily includes sales of ice cream and tea-based beverages.



Receive News & Ratings for Unilever NV Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Unilever NV and related companies with Analyst Ratings Network's FREE daily email newsletter.



 










Nicole Kennedy 























 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Sirius XM Making Big Investment In Pandora





Tax Reform Not Going Quite As Planned





Western Digital Files Lawsuit To Halt Toshiba Chip Business Sale





Sinclair Broadcast Group Announces Deal For Tribune Media





Starbucks Has A Hit With Its Unicorn Frappuccino











			© Watch List News, LLC 2008-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Staff 
			| Contact 










































